Illinois, session 104th, HB5797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Taxpayer and Investment Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and declarations. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) The State of Illinois competes vigorously with 9    other states and jurisdictions to attract major private 10    capital investment capable of generating transformative 11    economic benefits, including the creation of tens of 12    thousands of construction and permanent jobs, substantial 13    expansion of the property and sales tax base, and 14    long-term regional economic development.15        (2) Recent large-scale development projects across the 16    United States, including SoFi Stadium in Los Angeles, 17    Allegiant Stadium in Las Vegas, Nissan Stadium in 18    Nashville, and Highmark Stadium in Orchard Park, New York, 19    demonstrate both the opportunities and the challenges 20    associated with such projects.21        (3) Very large-scale private developments involving 22    private capital investment exceeding $2,500,000,000 23    present unique opportunities for economic growth but also   HB5797- 2 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    unique fiscal and infrastructure challenges, including 2    significant demands on regional transportation, utilities, 3    and public services, as well as substantial impacts on 4    existing property tax bases and local government budgets.5        (4) A general statutory framework applicable to 6    qualifying large-scale private developments in the State's 7    most populous counties provides necessary certainty to 8    investors, protects local taxing bodies and residents from 9    undue burden, promotes transparency and accountability, 10    and avoids the constitutional concerns associated with 11    purely project-specific or special legislation by 12    establishing clear, generally applicable eligibility 13    criteria and procedures.14    (b) It is the policy of this State and the purpose of this 15Act to:16        (1) encourage transformative private investment and 17    job creation while ensuring that the costs of growth are 18    not unfairly shifted onto existing taxpayers and that any 19    public participation is limited, transparent, 20    performance-based, and accompanied by rigorous independent 21    review, measurable commitments, and enforceable remedies, 22    including repayment obligations; and23        (2) establish clear, predictable, and highly 24    protective procedures under which qualifying private 25    developments may receive limited property tax certainty 26    through a payment in lieu of taxes and targeted public   HB5797- 3 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    infrastructure support, subject to mandatory independent 2    fiscal neutrality determinations, long-term operational 3    commitments with repayment consequences, strong clawback 4    mechanisms, and comprehensive transparency requirements. 5    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:6    "Affected taxing body" means a taxing body in which all or 7a portion of a qualifying project is located.8    "Certification" means the written fiscal neutrality 9determination issued under Section 30 of this Act.10    "Commission" means the Commission on Government 11Forecasting and Accountability.12    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 13Opportunity.14    "Developer" means any individual, corporation, limited 15liability company, partnership, or consortium that undertakes 16or proposes to undertake a qualifying project.17    "Development agreement" means the comprehensive agreement 18required under Section 35 of this Act.19    "Full-time employee" means an individual who is employed 20for consideration for at least 35 hours each week or who 21renders any other standard of service generally accepted by 22industry custom or practice as full-time employment. An 23individual for whom a W-2 is issued by a Professional Employer 24Organization (PEO) is a full-time employee if employed in the 25service of the applicant for consideration for at least 35   HB5797- 4 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1hours each week.2    "Infrastructure support" means financial or other 3assistance authorized under Section 25 of this Act for public 4infrastructure improvements.5    "Job creation target" means the employment of at least 500 6new full-time employees who are hired to support the business 7operations for the life of the project and who reside in the 8State.9    "NPT" or "negotiated property tax" means a negotiated 10property tax payment made by a developer to one or more taxing 11bodies in lieu of the ad valorem property taxes that would 12otherwise be due on improvements constructed as part of a 13qualifying project.14    "Project site" means the real property on which a 15qualifying project is or will be developed, as more 16particularly described in the applicable development 17agreement.18    "Qualifying project" means a private development that: (i) 19meets the job creation target set forth in this Section; (ii) 20involves total private capital investment exceeding 21$2,500,000,000; and (iii) is located in a county with a 22population that exceeds 1,000,000 according to the most recent 23federal decennial census for which data is available prior to 24the date on which the application is submitted to the 25Department.26    "Taxing body" means any unit of local government, school   HB5797- 5 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1district, community college district, or other entity 2authorized by law to levy ad valorem property taxes in the 3State of Illinois. 4    Section 15. Eligibility for benefits. A developer that 5undertakes a qualifying project may apply to the Department 6for the benefits authorized under this Act, including, but not 7limited to, an NPT agreement and infrastructure support, if 8the developer executes a development agreement containing all 9commitments required by this Act. 10    Section 20. NPT agreements authorized.11    (a) Upon satisfaction of the requirements of this Act, one 12or more taxing bodies may enter into an NPT agreement with the 13developer of a qualifying project.14    (b) An NPT agreement shall provide for a single annual NPT 15payment in full satisfaction of all ad valorem property taxes 16that would otherwise be levied on the improvements constructed 17on the project site as part of the qualifying project.18    (c) The initial amount of the annual NPT payment shall be 19determined through good-faith negotiation between the 20developer and the affected taxing bodies. The negotiation 21process shall follow these structured steps to ensure 22transparency, fairness, and alignment with taxpayer 23protections:24        (1) Within 30 days after submitting its application   HB5797- 6 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    under Section 15, the developer shall provide each 2    affected taxing body with an initial proposal, including a 3    proposed NPT amount and a preliminary fiscal impact 4    analysis prepared by an independent third party.5        (2) Each affected taxing body shall have 45 days after 6    receipt of the initial proposal to review the proposal and 7    provide a written response, which may include a 8    counter-proposal, requests for additional information, or 9    proposed modifications.10        (3) The parties shall conduct at least 2 good-faith 11    negotiation meetings, in person or virtually, within 60 12    days after the initial proposal is received by each of the 13    taxing bodies.14        (4) If the parties are unable to reach an agreement 15    within 90 days after the initial proposal is received by 16    each of the taxing bodies, any of the parties may request 17    non binding mediation by a neutral third party mutually 18    selected or facilitated by the Department.19        (5) In all negotiations, the parties shall consider: 20    (i) the certification required under Section 30; (ii) 21    projected service cost increases for the taxing bodies; 22    (iii) the economic benefits to the community; (iv) the 23    requirement to avoid any net shift of tax burden to 24    existing taxpayers; and (v) the allocation for homeowner 25    property tax relief.26        (6) The final NPT agreement shall be subject to at   HB5797- 7 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    least one public hearing in each affected taxing body 2    before approval by formal resolution of the governing body 3    of each affected taxing body. Notice of the hearing and 4    the proposed NPT amount shall be published on the 5    Department's website at least 14 days prior to the 6    hearing.7        (7) The payment amount, when considered together with 8    taxes generated by other components of the qualifying 9    project, must be sufficient to avoid any net shift of ad 10    valorem property tax burden onto existing taxpayers within 11    the affected taxing bodies, as confirmed by the 12    certification required under Section 30.13        (8) The annual NPT payment shall increase by 2.5% on 14    each anniversary of the effective date of the NPT 15    agreement.16        (9) The term of any NPT agreement shall not exceed 40 17    years from the date of substantial completion of the 18    qualifying project.19    (d) Each NPT agreement shall provide that at least 50% of 20the annual NPT revenues shall be allocated to provide direct 21property tax relief to residential property owners within the 22taxing bodies in a manner determined by the parties or as 23otherwise provided by law or intergovernmental agreement.24    (e) No NPT agreement shall become effective until the 25certification required under Section 30 has been issued and 26the development agreement required under Section 35 has been   HB5797- 8 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1executed. 2    Section 25. Infrastructure support authorized; conditions.3    (a) Subject to appropriation and the requirements of this 4Act, the State may provide infrastructure support for public 5infrastructure improvements that directly benefit a qualifying 6project and provide broader public benefit to the region in 7which the project is located.8    (b) The total amount of infrastructure support authorized 9under this Act for any single qualifying project shall not 10exceed $1,200,000,000.11    (c) Eligible public infrastructure improvements include 12highway and road access improvements, transit connections and 13related facilities, utility extensions and upgrades, 14stormwater management facilities, and public safety 15facilities.16    (d) The developer shall be solely and exclusively 17responsible for the costs of eligible infrastructure 18improvements that exceed the total amount of infrastructure 19support authorized under this Act or that are not approved as 20part of the development agreement.21    (e) Infrastructure support shall be provided only pursuant 22to a development agreement that includes a dedicated revenue 23recapture plan. The recapture plan shall dedicate a portion of 24incremental sales taxes, hotel taxes, and other revenues 25generated by the qualifying project to the repayment or offset   HB5797- 9 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1of State costs associated with the infrastructure support over 2a period not to exceed the term of the NPT agreement.3    (f) Infrastructure support shall be disbursed in tranches 4only upon a written determination by the Department or by an 5independent reviewer designated in the development agreement 6that specified milestones set forth in the development 7agreement have been achieved.8    (g) The developer shall be responsible for the ongoing 9maintenance of any infrastructure improvements constructed 10with infrastructure support that are located on or primarily 11serve the project site, unless otherwise provided in the 12development agreement. 13    Section 30. Fiscal neutrality certification required.14    (a) No NPT agreement or infrastructure support under this 15Act may take effect until the Commission issues a written 16fiscal neutrality certification in accordance with subsection 17(b). If the Commission declines to issue the certification or 18fails to act within 45 days after receiving a complete 19request, the certification shall be issued by an independent 20fiscal reviewer jointly selected by the affected taxing bodies 21and the Department.22    (b) The certification shall state, based on reasonable 23assumptions, methodologies, and independent economic and 24fiscal modeling, that the proposed NPT agreement and 25infrastructure support are projected to result in a net   HB5797- 10 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1positive fiscal impact for the taxing bodies over the full 2term of the agreements after accounting for all new tax 3revenues, NPT payments, infrastructure support costs 4(including any associated debt service or repayment 5obligations), and reasonably anticipated increases in demand 6for local government services attributable to the qualifying 7project. The certification must include specific findings that 8no net shift of ad valorem property tax burden to existing 9taxpayers will occur as a result of the proposed NPT agreement 10or infrastructure support.11    (c) The certification must specifically address and make 12explicit findings regarding whether the agreements will result 13in any shift of ad valorem property tax burden to existing 14residential or commercial property owners within the affected 15taxing bodies.16    (d) In preparing the certification, the Commission or 17independent reviewer, as applicable, shall consider, at a 18minimum:19        (1) the amount, timing, and growth rate of NPT 20    payments and new tax revenues generated by the qualifying 21    project;22        (2) the amount, timing, and repayment structure of any 23    infrastructure support;24        (3) the projected increases in demand for police, 25    fire, emergency medical, school, and other local 26    government services attributable to the qualifying project   HB5797- 11 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    and its employees and visitors;2        (4) the allocation of NPT revenues for direct 3    residential property tax relief; and4        (5) any other factors the Commission or reviewer deems 5    relevant to a complete fiscal impact analysis.6    (e) The certification shall be completed, issued in 7writing, and made available to the public on the Department's 8website for a period of at least 14 days before the execution 9of any development agreement.10    (f) The Department shall adopt rules establishing minimum 11standards and requirements for the economic and fiscal 12modeling used in the certification process. 13    Section 35. Development agreement required.14    (a) Before any NPT agreement or infrastructure support 15under this Act may take effect, the developer and the taxing 16bodies shall execute a comprehensive development agreement.17    (b) The development agreement shall include, at a minimum, 18the following provisions:19        (1) specific, measurable, and independently verifiable 20    targets for total private capital investment in the 21    qualifying project and for the creation of 22    construction-phase and permanent private-sector jobs;23        (2) a detailed project schedule with enforceable 24    milestones for permitting, financing, groundbreaking, 25    substantial completion, and commencement of operations;  HB5797- 12 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1        (3) provisions for workforce training, registered 2    apprenticeship programs, and good-faith efforts to hire 3    Illinois residents, with particular emphasis on residents 4    of the communities in which the project site is located;5        (4) a long-term operational commitment by the 6    developer to maintain the primary economic activity of the 7    qualifying project at the project site for a minimum 8    period of 30 years from the date of substantial 9    completion, together with a provision requiring pro rata 10    repayment of any infrastructure support previously 11    provided (together with interest at a commercially 12    reasonable rate specified in the development agreement) if 13    the developer materially ceases such primary economic 14    activity or relocates it outside the State of Illinois 15    before the expiration of that period;16        (5) claw back, recapture, and remedy provisions 17    consistent with Section 40 of this Act;18        (6) requirements for annual public reporting on 19    investment levels, job creation, and compliance with the 20    development agreement, together with provisions for 21    independent audits of such reports at the developer's 22    expense;23        (7) provisions addressing the developer's 24    responsibility for ongoing maintenance of infrastructure 25    improvements constructed with infrastructure support; and26        (8) an acknowledgment that all benefits authorized   HB5797- 13 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    under this Act are expressly conditioned upon issuance of 2    the certification required under Section 30 and ongoing 3    compliance with the development agreement.4    (c) The development agreement shall be subject to at least 5one public hearing in each municipality in which the project 6site is located and shall be a public record subject to 7disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act. 8    Section 40. Oversight, reporting, audits, and remedies.9    (a) The developer shall submit to the Department and to 10each affected taxing body an annual report, in a form and 11containing such information as the Department may prescribe by 12rule, detailing the amount of private capital invested, the 13number and types of jobs created, NPT payments made, and 14compliance with all terms of the development agreement during 15the preceding calendar year.16    (b) The Department may, at any time, conduct or cause to be 17conducted an independent audit of the developer's books and 18records to verify the accuracy of any report submitted under 19this Section. The cost of any such audit shall be borne by the 20developer if material discrepancies are found.21    (c) If the developer fails to substantially complete the 22qualifying project by the date specified in the development 23agreement, materially fails to meet the private investment or 24job creation target, or materially breaches the long-term 25operational commitment required under Section 35, then, in   HB5797- 14 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1addition to any other remedies available at law or in equity:2        (1) any NPT agreement then in effect shall 3    automatically terminate, and the project site and all 4    improvements thereon shall become subject to ad valorem 5    property taxation under the general laws of this State 6    from and after the date of such termination; and7        (2) any infrastructure support previously disbursed to 8    or on behalf of the developer shall become immediately due 9    and payable to the State of Illinois, together with 10    interest at the rate specified in the development 11    agreement.12    (d) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in the 13name of the People of the State of Illinois to enforce the 14provisions of this Act, any rule adopted under this Act, or any 15development agreement entered into pursuant to this Act. 16    Section 45. Projects to be valued at equalized assessed 17value. No affected taxing body shall increase its tax rate or 18extend additional taxes on any property not subject to an NPT 19agreement under this Act for the purpose of offsetting or 20compensating for any reduction in revenue resulting from an 21NPT agreement. Any revenue shortfall attributable to an NPT 22agreement shall be absorbed within the existing tax rates and 23extension limitations applicable to properties not subject to 24the NPT agreement consistent with the fiscal neutrality 25certification required under Section 30.   HB5797- 15 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    Section 50. Ethics and transparency requirements.2    (a) No elected official or employee of the State of 3Illinois or of any affected taxing body who participates in 4the review, negotiation, or approval of any application, NPT 5agreement, development agreement, or infrastructure support 6under this Act shall accept any gift, gratuity, entertainment, 7or thing of value from the developer or from any person or 8entity affiliated with or acting on behalf of the developer, 9except as may be expressly permitted under the State Officials 10and Employees Ethics Act or applicable local ethics ordinances 11or rules.12    (b) All documents relating to a qualifying project under 13this Act, including, but not limited to, the application, the 14certification, the development agreement, annual reports, and 15the results of any audits, shall be public records subject to 16inspection and copying under the Freedom of Information Act. 17    Section 55. Relationship to other laws. This Act is 18intended to supplement and not to limit, repeal, or otherwise 19affect any other provision of State law authorizing economic 20development incentives, tax increment financing, enterprise 21zones, or infrastructure assistance. With respect to 22qualifying projects, this Act shall control over any 23conflicting provisions of the Property Tax Code, including 24provisions governing the valuation, assessment, levy, or   HB5797- 16 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1collection of property taxes on improvements subject to an NPT 2agreement. In the event of any conflict between the provisions 3of this Act and any other law with respect to a qualifying 4project, the provisions of this Act shall control. 5    Section 60. Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt 6such rules as are necessary or appropriate to implement and 7administer this Act, including but not limited to rules 8governing the form and content of applications, the 9certification process, the minimum contents of development 10agreements, reporting requirements, and audit procedures. 11    Section 65. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 12its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid 13by a court of competent jurisdiction, such invalidity shall 14not affect any other provision or application of this Act that 15can be given effect without the invalid provision or 16application. 17    Section 900. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 18Division 23 to Article 10 as follows: 19    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 23 heading new)20Division 23. Taxpayer and Investment Protection Act. 21    (35 ILCS 200/10-1000 new)  HB5797- 17 -LRB104 22337 HLH 38784 b1    Sec. 10-1000. Taxpayer and Investment Protection Act. One 2or more taxing bodies may enter into a negotiated property tax 3agreement with the developer of a qualifying project as 4provided in the Taxpayer and Investment Protection Act. As 5used in this Section, the terms "negotiated property tax" and 6"taxing body" have the meanings given to those terms in the 7Taxpayer and Investment Protection Act. 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.